New York, session 2025-2026, S6340.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 250.45 of the penal law is amended by adding a new 2 subdivision 6 to read as follows: 3 6. Without the knowledge or consent of a person, such person inten- 4 tionally uses or permits the utilization of a device to surreptitiously 5 view, broadcast, or record another person, by means of aerial imaging 6 technology, at a place and time when a person has a reasonable expecta- 7 tion of privacy. 8 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD10011-01-5